Washington statutes.
RCW 1.40.010

State medal of merit established.

There is established a decoration of the state medal of merit with accompanying ribbons and appurtenances for award by the governor, in the name of the state, to any person who has been distinguished by exceptionally meritorious conduct in performing outstanding services to the people and state of Washington, upon the nomination of the governor's state medal of merit committee.

[ 1986 c 92 s 1.]